Wyoming, session 2025, SF0119.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 33-1-117(a)(ii), (v), by creating a
new paragraph (vii), (b)(intro), (i), by creating a new
paragraph (v), (e) through (g) and by creating new
subsections (h) through (m) is amended to read:
33-1-117. Expedited licenses and temporary permits
for military service members and military spouses.
(a) As used in this section:
(ii) "Applicant" means a military service member
or military spouse seeking licensure from a professional or
occupational licensing board of this state;
(v) "Military service member" means an active
member of the uniformed services as defined in W.S.
8-1-102(a)(xxii) or a person released from military service
within two (2) years of applying for licensure,
certification or registration pursuant to this section and
whose service was characterized upon release as honorable;
(vii) "Military service" means service in the
uniformed services as defined in W.S. 8-1-102(a)(xxii).
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0119
ENROLLED ACT NO. 41, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(b) A professional or occupational licensing board
shall issue an expedited license to a military service
member or military spouse to within thirty (30) days of
receiving a completed application or within thirty (30)
days after an applicant's request, without filing a
completed application, if the applicant holds a relevant,
active occupational or professional license in good
standing from another jurisdiction for not less than five
(5) consecutive years. An expedited license issued under
this subsection would allow the military service member or
military spouse to lawfully practice a profession or
occupation requiring licensure in this state if the
military service member or military spouse:
(i) Holds a relevant, active occupational or
professional license in good standing from another state
and provides a military identification card, their spouse's
military identification card or a marriage license as proof
of being a military service member or military spouse;
(v) Provides a copy of military orders for
military service in this state, or evidence of an honorable
service characterization upon release from military
service, and submits to the authority of the licensing
authority in this state for purposes of standards of
practice, discipline and fulfillment of any continuing
education requirements.
(e) Pursuant to rules which may shall be adopted for
this purpose, a professional or occupational licensing
board may issue a temporary practice permit to a military
service member or military spouse applicant who meets the
requirements of paragraph (b)(i) of this section and who
has applied for a professional or occupational license
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0119
ENROLLED ACT NO. 41, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
under this section. The military service member or
military spouse applicant may practice under the temporary
permit for a period not to exceed three (3) years provided
the military service member or military spouse is making
progress toward satisfying the unmet licensure
requirements, or until the professional or occupational
license for which they have applied has been either granted
or denied, whichever first occurs. A board shall not charge
a military service member or military spouse any fees for a
temporary permit under this subsection.
(f) Professional or occupational licensing boards
shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section,
including the implementation of online applications for
licensure and professional or occupational licensing by
reciprocity for military service members or military
spouses.
(g) On each licensure application or renewal form, a
professional or occupational licensing board shall inquire
and maintain a record of whether an applicant is a member
of the military or is a military spouse. If an applicant
self-identifies as and provides the board with satisfactory
proof that the applicant is a military service member or
military spouse, the board shall immediately commence the
process of issuing a license or temporary permit and shall
issue the license or temporary permit within thirty (30)
days of receiving an application.
(h) In determining whether a military service member
applicant's education and training meet a professional or
occupational licensing board's respective educational and
training requirements, the board shall consider any
relevant education, training and experience received by the
applicant as a member of the armed forces or reserves of
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0119
ENROLLED ACT NO. 41, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
the United States, the national guard of any state, the
military reserves of any state or the naval militia of any
state.
(j) Any emergency medical service license sought
under W.S. 33-36-110 through 33-36-113 by a veteran of
military service, by a military service member except a
member of the national guard, by a national guard member
separating from an active duty tour or by the spouse of any
of these persons shall be processed and considered pursuant
to the requirements of the Recognition of Emergency Medical
Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact Act, W.S.
33-36-202.
(k) Except as otherwise provided in this section,
military service member and military spouse applicants
shall be subject to the other provisions of this title and
to any requirements properly adopted by the professional or
occupational licensing board to which the applicant has
applied.
(m) A professional or occupational licensing board
shall issue a temporary license to a military service
member or military spouse after receiving a completed
application under this section, but while the application
is pending review by the board, if the applicant holds a
relevant, active occupational or professional license in
good standing from another jurisdiction for not less than
three (3) consecutive years. The military service member or
military spouse applicant may practice under the temporary
license for a period not to exceed ninety (90) days. A
board shall not charge a military service member or
military spouse any fees for a temporary license under this
subsection.
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0119
ENROLLED ACT NO. 41, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. W.S. 33-1-116 and 33-1-117(b)(ii) are
repealed.
Section 3. This act shall apply to applications for
professional licensing that are filed on or after the
effective date of this act.
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
5